Hawaii statutes.
[§481E-13] Prohibited conduct. (a) An
athlete agent, with the intent to induce a student-athlete to enter into an
agency contract, may not:

(1) Give any materially false or misleading
information or make a materially false promise or representation;

(2) Furnish anything of value to a student-athlete
before the student-athlete enters into the agency contract; or

(3) Furnish anything of value to any individual other
than the student-athlete or another registered athlete agent.

(b) An athlete agent may not intentionally:

(1) Initiate contact with a student-athlete unless
registered under this chapter;

(2) Refuse or fail to retain or permit inspection of
the records required to be retained by section 481E-12;

(3) Fail to register when required by section 481E-3;

(4) Provide materially false or misleading
information in an application for registration or renewal of registration;

(5) Predate or postdate an agency contract; or

(6) Fail to notify a student-athlete before the
student-athlete signs or otherwise authenticates an agency contract for a
particular sport that the signing or authentication may make the
student-athlete ineligible to participate as a student-athlete in that sport.
[L 2007, c 248, pt of §2]

Previous
Vol11_Ch0476-0490
Next